Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.400

Meetings of presidents.

It shall be the duty of the presidents of the several regional universities to meet at least once annually to consult with each other relative to the management of the regional universities.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 62.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.